Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. FINANCES

SUBTITLE B. COUNTY FINANCES

CHAPTER 118. FEES CHARGED BY COUNTY OFFICERS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 118.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "document" includes any instrument, document, paper, or record.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 118.002. BILL FOR FEES. A fee under this chapter is not payable to a person until a clerk or officer produces or is ready to produce a bill in writing containing the details of the fee to the person who owes the fee. The bill must be signed by the clerk or officer to whom the fee is due or who charges the fee or by the successor in office or legal representative of the clerk or officer.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 31, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER B. FEES OF COUNTY CLERK OTHER THAN COURT FEES

Sec. 118.011. FEE SCHEDULE. (a) A county clerk shall collect the following fees for services rendered to any person:

(1) Personal Property Records Filing (Sec. 118.012):

(A) for the first page

$ 5.00;

(B) for each additional page or part of a page on which there are visible marks of any kind

$ 4.00;

(2) Real Property Records Filing (Sec. 118.013):

(A) for the first page

$ 5.00;

(B) for each additional page or part of a page on which there are visible marks of any kind

$ 4.00;

(C) for all or part of each 8-1/2" X 14" attachment or rider

$ 4.00;

(D) for each name in excess of five names that has to be indexed in all records in which the document must be indexed

$ 0.25;

(3) Certified Papers (Sec. 118.014):

(A) for the clerk's certificate

$ 5.00;

(B) printed on paper, plus a fee for each page or part of a page

$ 1.00;

(C) that is a paper document converted to electronic format, for each page or part of a page

$1;

(D) that is an electronic copy of an electronic document:

(i) for each document up to 10 pages in length

$1;

(ii) for each page or part of a page of a document over 10 pages

$0.10;

(4) Noncertified Papers (Sec. 118.0145):

(A) printed on paper, for each page or part of a page

$ 1.00;

(B) that is a paper document converted to electronic format, for each page or part of a page

$1;

(C) that is an electronic copy of an electronic document:

(i) for each document up to 10 pages in length

$1;

(ii) for each page or part of a page of a document over 10 pages

$0.10;

(5) Birth or Death Certificate (Sec. 118.015)

same as state registrar;

(6) Bond Approval (Sec. 118.016)

$ 3.00;

(7) Marriage License (Sec. 118.018)

$60.00;

(8) Declaration of Informal Marriage (Sec. 118.019)

$25.00;

(9) Brand Registration (Sec. 118.020)

$ 5.00;

(10) Oath Administration (Sec. 118.021)

$ 1.00.

(b) The county clerk may set and collect the following fee from any person:

(1) Returned Check (Sec. 118.0215) . . . . . . not less than $15 or more than $30

(2) Records Management and Preservation Fee (Sec. 118.0216) . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . not more than $10

(3) Mental Health Background Check for License to Carry a Handgun (Sec. 118.0217) . . . . . not more than $2

(4) Marriage License for Out-of-State Applicants (Sec. 118.018) . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $100

(c) The clerk shall charge reasonable fees for performing other duties prescribed or authorized by statute for which a fee is not prescribed by this subchapter.

(d) The county clerk may not charge the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service a fee for a copy of any document on file or of record in the clerk's office relating to an individual's criminal history, regardless of whether the document is certified.

(e) A county clerk who provides a copy in a format other than paper of a record maintained by the clerk shall provide the copy and charge a fee in accordance with Sections 552.231 and 552.262, Government Code.

(f) The county clerk of a county shall, if the commissioners court of the county adopts the fee as part of the county's annual budget, collect the following fee from any person:

(1) Records Archive Fee (Sec. 118.025) . . . . . . . not more than $10

(2) Records Technology and Infrastructure Fee (Sec. 118.026) . . . . . . . $2.00

(g) The county clerk of a county shall, if the commissioners court of the county adopts the fee, collect the following fee from any person:

Real Property Records Filing (Sec. 118.0131) . . . . . . . not more than $10

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 18(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 587, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 451, Sec. 4, eff; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd., ch. 465, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 185, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1400, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 794, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1155, Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 413, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 974, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(105), (106), 3(31), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 804 (S.B. 526), Sec. 7, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1216 (H.B. 950), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 327 (H.B. 2685), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2008.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 1513), Sec. 1.04, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 1513), Sec. 2.04, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 379 (H.B. 1062), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 437 (H.B. 910), Sec. 31(a), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 437 (H.B. 910), Sec. 32(a), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 985 (S.B. 1964), Sec. 5, eff. June 19, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 695 (H.B. 555), Sec. 3, eff. June 12, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1227 (S.B. 658), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 256 (S.B. 1612), Sec. 16, eff. January 1, 2024.

Sec. 118.012. PERSONAL PROPERTY RECORDS FILING. (a) The fee for "Personal Property Records Filing" under Section 118.011 is for filing or filing and registering, including indexing, in the personal property, chattels, or personal records in the office of the county clerk a document that is authorized or required to be filed in those records.

(b) The fee does not apply to:

(1) notary public records;

(2) marriage records;

(3) vital statistics records;

(4) documents filed in the records of county civil or criminal courts or probate courts;

(5) documents filed and recorded in the real property records in the office of the county clerk; or

(6) instruments for which the filing fee is fixed by the Business & Commerce Code.

(c) This fee is in addition to any other specific fee provided for by other statute.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 118.013. REAL PROPERTY RECORDS FILING. (a) The fee for "Real Property Records Filing" under Section 118.011 is for filing and recording, including indexing, in the real property records in the office of the county clerk a document that is authorized or required to be filed in those records.

(b) A county clerk who files, registers, or records an instrument by manual copying instead of copying by photocopy, photostating, or microphotographic process may substitute for the prescribed page fee a fee of 20 cents per 100 words for each page having more than 500 words.

(c) The fee does not apply to:

(1) map records;

(2) condominium records;

(3) notary public records;

(4) marriage records;

(5) vital statistics records;

(6) documents filed in the records of county civil or criminal courts or probate courts; or

(7) personal property, chattels, and personal records in the office of the county clerk.

(d) The fee is in addition to any other specific fee provided for by other statute.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 118.0131. OPTIONAL RECORDING FEES FOR COURT FACILITIES: HIDALGO COUNTY AND CAMERON COUNTY. The county clerk of Hidalgo County and the county clerk of Cameron County may assess an additional fee not to exceed $10 for real property records filing to fund the construction, renovation, or improvement of court facilities, if authorized by the commissioners court of the county.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 985 (S.B. 1964), Sec. 6, eff. June 19, 2015.

Sec. 118.0135. WAIVER OF REAL PROPERTY FILING FEES. (a) The commissioners court may direct the county clerk to waive fees for the filing of real property records under this subchapter for a person who is buying or improving the person's home with assistance from a federal or state grant or aid program that promotes home ownership or home improvement for persons of low or moderate income.

(b) The commissioners court shall specify the types of grant or aid programs that qualify a person for a fee waiver under this section and may limit the waiver to only certain programs.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 108, Sec. 1, eff. May 17, 1999.

Sec. 118.014. CERTIFIED PAPERS. (a) The fees for "Certified Papers" under Section 118.011 are for the county clerk's certificate that shall be placed on each page or part of a page, and a fee for copying each page or part of a page, of a notice, statement, license, or document that the clerk is authorized or required to issue. The fees must be paid at the time the order is placed.

(b) The fee does not apply to:

(1) a certified document for the issuance of which this subchapter prescribes another fee;

(2) a certified copy of map records or condominium records; or

(3) a license for which the fee for issuance is specifically provided by other statute.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 451, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 118.0145. NONCERTIFIED PAPERS. (a) The fee for "Noncertified Papers" under Section 118.011 is for issuing a noncertified copy of each page or part of a page of a document. The fee must be paid at the time the order is placed.

(b) A county clerk may waive or reduce the fee provided in Section 118.011 for issuing a noncertified copy of a page or a portion of a page of a document if the document:

(1) involves a matter relating to family law, including a divorce decree; or

(2) is the record of a judgment in a misdemeanor case.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 764, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 118.015. BIRTH OR DEATH CERTIFICATE. (a) The fee for "Birth or Death Certificate" under Section 118.011 is for issuing a certified copy of a birth certificate or death certificate and is the same as the fee charged under Subchapter C, Chapter 191, Health and Safety Code, by the state registrar of vital statistics and the local registrar of births and deaths.

(b) A county clerk who collects a fee under this section for a certified copy of a birth certificate shall deposit the fee into the county treasury. The state's portion of the fee shall be sent to the comptroller as provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 133.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 14, Sec. 284(68), eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 305, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 209, Sec. 74(a), eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 263 (H.B. 2962), Sec. 4, eff. May 30, 2005.

Sec. 118.016. BOND APPROVAL. The fee for "Bond Approval" under Section 118.011 is for approving bonds other than notarial bonds and bonds required to be approved in a county civil or criminal court or in a probate court. The fee must be paid at the time of approval.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 118.018. MARRIAGE LICENSE. (a) The fee for "Marriage License" under Section 118.011 is for issuing a marriage license. The fee must be paid at the time the license is issued, except as provided by Subsection (b-1).

(b) The fee includes every service relating to issuance of the license, including preparing the application, filing health certificates, administering oaths, filing waivers and orders of the county judge, and issuing and recording all papers including the return of the license.

(b-1) The county clerk shall issue a marriage license without collecting a marriage license fee from an applicant who:

(1) completes a premarital education course described by Section 2.013, Family Code;

(2) provides to the county clerk a premarital education course completion certificate indicating completion of the premarital education course not more than one year before the date the marriage license application is filed with the clerk; and

(3) provides proof satisfactory to the county clerk that the applicant is a resident of this state.

(c) A person applying for a marriage license may make a voluntary contribution of $5 to promote healthy early childhood by supporting the Texas Home Visiting Program administered by the Office of Early Childhood Coordination of the Health and Human Services Commission. A county clerk shall collect the additional voluntary contribution under this section.

(d) If neither applicant for a marriage license provides proof satisfactory to the county clerk that the applicant is a resident of this state, the county clerk may collect an additional fee of $100 for issuing the marriage license.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 185, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 209, Sec. 75(a), eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 327 (H.B. 2685), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2008.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 327 (H.B. 2685), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2008.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 820 (S.B. 1836), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 695 (H.B. 555), Sec. 5, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 118.019. DECLARATION OF INFORMAL MARRIAGE. The fee for "Declaration of Informal Marriage" under Section 118.011 is for all services rendered in connection with the execution of a declaration of informal marriage under Section 1.92, Family Code. The fee shall be collected at the time the service is rendered.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 118.020. BRAND REGISTRATION. The fee for "Brand Registration" under Section 118.011 is for registering a brand, including indexing, searching the records, and issuing the certificate.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 118.021. OATH ADMINISTRATION. (a) The fee for "Oath Administration" under Section 118.011 is for administering an oath with or without the seal of the clerk.

(b) The fee does not apply to oaths required to be administered in performing a duty as clerk of county civil or criminal courts or as clerk of a probate court.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 118.0215. RETURNED CHECK. The fee for "Returned Check" under Section 118.011 is for a check that is presented to the county clerk in payment of taxes or any other item the person owes to the county and is returned by the depository bank or any other financial institution because of:

(1) insufficient funds to cover the check;

(2) a closed account;

(3) an unauthorized signature;

(4) a check drawn on uncollected funds; or

(5) any other reason considered to be the fault of the drawer.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 18(c), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 118.0216. RECORDS MANAGEMENT AND PRESERVATION. (a) The fee for "Records Management and Preservation" under Section 118.011 is for the records management and preservation services performed by the county clerk after the filing and recording of a document in the records of the office of the clerk.

(b) The fee must be paid at the time of the filing of the document.

(c) The fee shall be deposited in a separate records management and preservation account in the general fund of the county.

(d) The fee may be used only to provide funds for specific records management and preservation, including for automation purposes.

(e) All expenditures from the records management and preservation account shall comply with Subchapter C, Chapter 262.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 587, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 794, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 540 (S.B. 1574), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 330 (H.B. 2716), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 118.0217. MENTAL HEALTH BACKGROUND CHECK. (a) The fee for a "mental health background check for license to carry a handgun" is for a check, conducted by the county clerk at the request of the Texas Department of Public Safety, of the county records involving the mental condition of a person who applies for a license to carry a handgun under Subchapter H, Chapter 411, Government Code. The fee, not to exceed $2, will be paid from the application fee submitted to the Department of Public Safety according to Section 411.174(a)(6), Government Code.

(b) This section and Section 118.011(b)(3) do not affect the procedures for access to court records prescribed by Section 571.015, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1400, Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 437 (H.B. 910), Sec. 33, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 118.022. DISPOSITION OF MARRIAGE LICENSE AND DECLARATION FEES. (a) If the county clerk collects a fee for issuing a marriage license, the county clerk shall deposit, as provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 133:

(1) $20 of each fee collected for issuing a marriage license or $12.50 of each fee for recording a declaration of informal marriage to be sent to the comptroller and deposited as provided by Subsection (b);

(2) $10 of each fee collected for issuing a marriage license to be sent to the comptroller and deposited as provided by Subsection (c); and

(3) if applicable, the $5 voluntary contribution collected to promote healthy early childhood by supporting the Texas Home Visiting Program administered by the Office of Early Childhood Coordination of the Health and Human Services Commission to be sent to the comptroller and deposited as provided by Subsection (d).

(b) The comptroller shall deposit the money received under Subsection (a)(1) to the credit of the child abuse and neglect prevention trust fund account established under Section 137.054, Human Resources Code.

(c) The comptroller shall deposit the money received under Subsection (a)(2) to the credit of the family trust fund account established under Section 2.014, Family Code.

Text of subsection effective until April 01, 2025

(d) The comptroller shall deposit the money received under Subsection (a)(3) in the Texas Home Visiting Program trust fund under Section 531.287, Government Code.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(d) The comptroller shall deposit the money received under Subsection (a)(3) in the Texas Home Visiting Program trust fund under Section 523.0306, Government Code.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 957, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 209, Sec. 76(a), eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 327 (H.B. 2685), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2008.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 820 (S.B. 1836), Sec. 5, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.143, eff. April 1, 2025.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1033 (S.B. 24), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 118.023. FEES FOR EX OFFICIO SERVICES. (a) If the county clerk receives fees for ex officio services or for other public services not otherwise provided for, the commissioners court shall set the fees. The fees shall be paid quarterly out of the county treasury on the order of the commissioners court.

(b) A county clerk may not be compelled to file or record any instrument or writing authorized or required to be recorded until payment for all fees has been tendered. This provision does not apply to papers or instruments filed or recorded in suits pending in county court.

(c) In this section, "ex officio services" includes services in relation to roads, bridges, and ferries; issuing and taking receipts for jury scrip or county orders for payment; services in habeas corpus cases; making out bar dockets; keeping records of trust funds; filing and docketing all papers for the commissioners court; keeping road overseers' books and lists of hands; recording all collection returns of delinquent insolvents; recording county treasurer's reports; recording reports of justices of the peace; recording reports of animals slaughtered; and services in connection with elections.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 373), Sec. 27, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 118.024. FREE ACCESS TO RECORDS. (a) This subchapter does not limit or deny any person full and free access to any document referred to in this subchapter. A person is entitled to read, examine, and copy from those documents or from any microfilm or other photographic image of the documents.

(b) A person may exercise the right provided by this section without paying any charge under the reasonable rules of the county clerk at all reasonable times during the hours in which the clerk's office is open to the public.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 118.025. COUNTY CLERK'S RECORDS ARCHIVE. (a) In this section:

(1) "Deterioration" means any naturally occurring process or a natural disaster that results in the destruction or partial destruction of a public document.

(2) "Preservation" means any process that:

(A) suspends or reduces the deterioration of public documents; or

(B) provides public access to the public documents in a manner that reduces the risk of deterioration, excluding providing public access to public documents indexed geographically.

(3) "Public document" means any instrument, document, paper, or other record that the county clerk is authorized to accept for filing or maintaining.

(4) Repealed by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 804, Sec. 7, eff. June 17, 2005.

(5) "Restoration" means any process that permits the visual enhancement of a public document, including making the document more legible.

(b) The commissioners court of a county may adopt a records archive fee under Section 118.011(f) as part of the county's annual budget. The fee must be set and itemized in the county's budget as part of the budget preparation process. The fee for "Records Archive" under Section 118.011(f) is for the preservation and restoration services performed by the county clerk in connection with maintaining a county clerk's records archive.

(c) The fee must be paid at the time a person, excluding a state agency, presents a public document to the county clerk for recording or filing.

(d) The fee shall be deposited in a separate records archive account in the general fund of the county. Any interest accrued remains with the account.

(e) The funds generated from the collection of a fee under this section may be expended only for the preservation and restoration of the county clerk's records archive. The county clerk shall designate the public documents that are part of the records archive for purposes of this section. The designation of public documents by the county clerk under this subsection is subject to approval by the commissioners court in a public meeting during the budget process.

(f) The funds may not be used to purchase, lease, or develop computer software to geographically index public records, excluding indexing public records by lot and block description as provided by Section 193.009(b)(4).

(g) Before collecting the fee under this section, the county clerk shall prepare an annual written plan for funding the preservation and restoration of the county clerk's records archive. The commissioners court shall publish notice of a public hearing on the plan in a newspaper of general circulation in the county not later than the 15th day before the date of the hearing. After the public hearing, the plan shall be considered for approval by the commissioners court. Funds from the records archive account may be expended only as provided by the plan. All expenditures from the records archive account shall comply with Subchapter C, Chapter 262. The hearing may be held during the budget process. After establishing the fee, the plan may be approved annually during the budget process.

(h) If a county charges a fee under this section, a notice shall be posted in a conspicuous place in the county clerk's office. The notice must state the amount of the fee in the following form: "THE COMMISSIONERS COURT OF _______________ COUNTY HAS DETERMINED THAT A RECORDS ARCHIVE FEE OF $________ IS NEEDED TO PRESERVE AND RESTORE COUNTY RECORDS."

(i) The fee is subject to approval by the commissioners court in a public meeting during the budget process.

(j) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 330, Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

(k) Repealed by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 804, Sec. 7, eff. June 17, 2005.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 794, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 974, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 3(32), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 804 (S.B. 526), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 804 (S.B. 526), Sec. 7, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 330 (H.B. 2716), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 330 (H.B. 2716), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 118.026. FEE FOR COUNTY RECORDS TECHNOLOGY AND INFRASTRUCTURE IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) The commissioners court of a county that borders the United Mexican States and the Gulf of Mexico may adopt a records technology and infrastructure fee as part of the county's annual budget. The fee must be set and itemized in the county's budget as part of the budget preparation process.

(b) The fee must be paid at the time a person pays a fee under Section 118.0216 or, if applicable, Section 118.025.

(c) The fee shall be deposited in a separate records technology and infrastructure account in the general fund of the county. Any interest accrued remains with the account.

(d) The funds generated from the collection of a fee under this section may be used only for technology and infrastructure for the maintenance of county records and the operation of the county records system.

(e) The fee is subject to approval by the commissioners court in a public meeting during the budget process.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 379 (H.B. 1062), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER C. FEES OF CLERK OF COUNTY COURT

Sec. 118.051. CLERICAL DUTIES. The fees listed in this subchapter for county civil court dockets under Section 118.052(1) and county probate court dockets under Section 118.052(2) are fees for all clerical duties performed in connection with the docket, including:

(1) filing, registering or recording, docketing, and taxing costs for an application, will, complaint, petition, return, document, or proceeding;

(2) issuing and recording the return of a citation, notice, subpoena, commission to take depositions, execution while the docket is still open (civil docket), garnishment before judgment (civil docket), order, writ, process, or any other document authorized or required to be issued by the clerk on which a return must be recorded;

(3) attendances in court as clerk of the court;

(4) impaneling a jury (civil docket);

(5) swearing witnesses;

(6) approving bonds involved in court action; and

(7) administering oaths.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 96 (H.B. 1295), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 3.02, eff. January 1, 2022.

Sec. 118.052. FEE SCHEDULE. Each clerk of a county court shall collect the following fees for services rendered to any person:

(1) CIVIL COURT ACTIONS

(A) Preparation of the clerk's record of transfer under Sections 33.105 and 1023.006, Estates Code, Section 155.207, Family Code, and Sections 51.3071 and 51.403, Government Code:

(i) for the clerk's transfer certificate and index . . . . . . $5;

(ii) for each page or part of a page of a case record up to 10 pages in length . . . . . . $1.00;

(iii) for each page or part of a page of a case record over 10 pages . . . . . . $0.10;

(B) Services Rendered After Judgment in Original Action (Sec. 118.0545):

(i) Abstract of judgment . . . $ 8.00;

(ii) Execution, order of sale, writ, or other process . . . $ 8.00;

(2) PROBATE COURT ACTIONS

(A) Services in Pending Probate Action (Sec. 118.056):

(i) Filing an inventory and appraisement as provided by Section 118.056(d) . . . $25.00;

(ii) Approving and recording bond . . . $ 5.00;

(iii) Administering oath . . . $ 2.00;

(iv) Filing annual or final account of estate . . . $25.00;

(v) Filing application for sale of real or personal property . . . $25.00;

(vi) Filing annual or final report of guardian of a person . . . $10.00;

(vii) Filing a document not listed under this paragraph after the filing of an order approving the inventory and appraisement or after the 120th day after the date of the initial filing of the action, whichever occurs first, if more than 25 pages . . . $25.00;

(B) Claim Against Estate (Sec. 118.058) . . . $10.00;

(C) Preparation of the clerk's record of transfer under Sections 33.105 and 1023.006, Estates Code, Section 155.207, Family Code, and Sections 51.3071 and 51.403, Government Code:

(i) for the clerk's transfer certificate and index . . . . . . $5;

(ii) for each page or part of a page of a case record up to 10 pages in length . . . . . . $1.00;

(iii) for each page or part of a page of a case record over 10 pages . . . . . . $0.10;

(3) OTHER FEES

(A) Issuing Document (Sec. 118.059):

(i) original document and one copy . . . $ 8.00;

(ii) each additional set of an original and one copy . . . $ 8.00;

(B) Certified Papers (Sec. 118.060):

(i) for the clerk's certificate . . . $ 5.00;

(ii) printed on paper, plus a fee per page or part of a page of . . . $ 1.00;

(iii) that is a paper document converted to electronic format, for each page or part of a page . . . . . . $1;

(iv) that is an electronic copy of an electronic document:

(a) for each document up to 10 pages in length . . . . . . $1;

(b) for each page or part of a page of a document over 10 pages . . . . . . $0.10;

(C) Noncertified Papers (Sec. 118.0605):

(i) printed on paper, for each page or part of a page . . . $ 1.00;

(ii) that is a paper converted to electronic format, for each page or part of a page . . . $ 1.00;

(iii) that is an electronic copy of an electronic document:

(a) for each document up to 10 pages in length . . . $ 1.00;

(b) for each page or part of a page of a document over 10 pages . . . $ 0.10;

(D) Letters Testamentary, Letter of Guardianship, Letter of Administration, or Abstract of Judgment (Sec. 118.061) . . . $ 2.00;

(E) Deposit and Safekeeping of Wills (Sec. 118.062) . . . $ 5.00;

(F) Mail Service of Process (Sec. 118.063) . . . same as sheriff;

(G) Searching files or records to locate a cause when the docket number is not provided . . . $ 5.00;

(H) Records Technology and Infrastructure Fee if authorized by the commissioners court of the county (Sec. 118.026) . . . $ 2.00;

(I) Preparation of the clerk's record for appeal, per page or part of a page . . . $1.00.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 19(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1080, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 587, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 675, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 764, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 28, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1001, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1233 (H.B. 1404), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 96 (H.B. 1295), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 399 (S.B. 819), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 671 (H.B. 1755), Sec. 4, eff. January 1, 2014.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 379 (H.B. 1062), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 654 (H.B. 2182), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 701 (H.B. 2207), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 3.02, eff. January 1, 2022.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 256 (S.B. 1612), Sec. 17, eff. January 1, 2024.

Sec. 118.0525. INCREASED FEE FOR NONCOMPLIANCE WITH DOCUMENT SPECIFICATIONS. If a legal paper presented to a county clerk for filing or for recording does not comply with the specifications prescribed by Section 191.007, the filing fee or recording fee for the paper is increased as provided by that section.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 20(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 118.0526. COPIES OF COURT RECORDS PRESERVED ONLY ON MICROFILM OR BY ELECTRONIC METHOD. (a) On the written request of a party in an action, the clerk of a county court shall provide the court with a copy of a motion, order, or other pleading in the action that is preserved only on microfilm or by other electronic means. The request must specify the document sought and the approximate date that the document was filed.

(b) The county clerk may not charge a fee for a copy made under this section.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1356, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 118.0545. SERVICES RENDERED AFTER JUDGMENT IN ORIGINAL ACTION. (a) The fees for "Services Rendered After Judgment in Original Action" under Section 118.052(1) are for services rendered after judgment in an original action filed in a county civil court.

(b) The fee for an "Abstract of judgment" under Section 118.052(1) is for issuing an abstract of judgment.

(b-1) The fee for "Preparation of the clerk's record for appeal" under Section 118.052(1) is for preparation of the clerk's record for appeal.

(c) The fee for an "Execution, order of sale, writ, or other process" under Section 118.052(1) is for issuing and recording the return on any of those documents. The fee applies only to a writ or process for the issuance of which another fee is not provided by this subchapter.

(d) The fee is charged of the party requesting the service and is due at the time the service is requested.

(e) In this section, "original action" includes an appeal from a justice of the peace or a corporation court and a transfer of an action from another jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 19(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 3.03, eff. January 1, 2022.

Text of section as amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 66, Sec. 1

Sec. 118.056. SERVICES IN PENDING PROBATE ACTION. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the fees for "Services in Pending Probate Action" under Section 118.052(2) are for services in an action in an open probate docket rendered after the filing of an order approving the inventory and appraisement or after the 120th day after the date of the initial filing of the action, whichever occurs first.

(b) The fee for filing a document also applies to each page or part of a page for the filing of a document or exhibit filed by a movant after the filing of an original answer or response, after the filing of an order approving the inventory and appraisement, or after the 120th day after the date of the initial filing of the action, whichever occurs first, and before the filing of an adverse action, contest, suit, or pleading seeking affirmative relief.

(c) Each fee shall be paid at the time of the filing or the rendering of the service and is in addition to other fees prescribed by Section 118.052.

(d) The fee for filing an inventory and appraisement under Section 118.052(2)(B)(i) applies only if the instrument is filed after the 90th day after the date the personal representative has qualified to serve or, if the court grants an extension under Section 309.051, Estates Code, after the date of the extended deadline specified by the court.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 66, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 399 (S.B. 819), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 20.021, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 3.04, eff. January 1, 2022.

Sec. 118.058. CLAIM AGAINST ESTATE. (a) The fee for "Claim Against Estate" under Section 118.052(2) is for clerical duties in connection with filing and entering a claim against an estate.

(b) The fee must be paid by the claimant at the time the claim is filed.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 118.059. ISSUING DOCUMENT. (a) The fee for "Issuing Document" under Section 118.052(3) is for issuing an original document and one copy and includes recording the return of the document.

(b) The fee for issuing for the same action at the same time more than one set of an original and one copy of the same document includes recording the return of the document. The fee must be paid at the time the order is placed.

(c) In this section, "document" includes a subpoena, citation, notice, commission to take depositions, execution, order, writ, process, or other instrument or paper authorized or required to be issued by the clerk.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 451, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 3.05, eff. January 1, 2022.

Sec. 118.060. CERTIFIED PAPERS, NO RETURN REQUIRED. (a) The fees for "Certified Papers" under Section 118.052(3) are for the county clerk's certificate that shall be placed on each page or part of a page, and a fee for copying each page or part of a page, of a notice, statement, transcript, or other document authorized or required to be issued by the clerk.

(b) The fee must be paid at the time the order is placed.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 451, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 118.0605. NONCERTIFIED PAPERS. (a) The fee for "Noncertified Papers" under Section 118.052(3) is for issuing a noncertified copy of each page or part of a page of a document.

(b) The fee must be paid at the time the order is placed.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 118.061. LETTERS AND ABSTRACTS. The fee for "Letters Testamentary, Letter of Guardianship, Letter of Administration, or Abstract of Judgment" under Section 118.052(3) is for the issuing of any of those documents.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 118.062. DEPOSIT AND SAFEKEEPING OF WILLS. The fee for "Deposit and Safekeeping of Wills" under Section 118.052(3) is for receiving and keeping wills deposited for safekeeping. The fee must be paid at the time the will is deposited with the county clerk.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 701 (H.B. 2207), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 118.063. MAIL SERVICE OF PROCESS. The fee for "Mail Service of Process" under Section 118.052(3) is for the clerk's service of process by certified or registered mail. The fee is the same amount that sheriffs and constables are authorized to charge under Section 118.131.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 118.065. FREE ACCESS TO RECORDS. (a) This subchapter does not limit or deny any person full and free access to any document referred to in this subchapter. A person is entitled to read, examine, and copy from those documents or from any microfilm or other photographic image of the documents.

(b) A person may, without paying any charge, exercise the right provided by this section under the reasonable rules of the county clerk at all reasonable times during the hours in which the clerk's office is open to the public.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 118.066. PROHIBITED FEES. A county clerk is not entitled to a fee for:

(1) the examination of a paper or record in the clerk's office;

(2) filing any process or document the clerk issues that is returned to court;

(3) a motion or judgment on a motion for security for costs; or

(4) taking or approving a bond for costs.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 32, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 118.070. FEE FOR SEARCH OF RECORDS. The clerk of a county court may collect a fee for searching files or records to locate a cause when the docket number is not provided.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 3.06, eff. January 1, 2022.

SUBCHAPTER D. FEES OF COUNTY JUDGE

Sec. 118.101. FEE SCHEDULE. The county judge shall collect the following fees in probate matters:

(1) Probate of a will

$2.00

(2) Granting letters testamentary, letter of guardianship, or letter of administration

$2.00

(3) Order of sale

$2.00

(4) Approval and confirmation of sale

$2.00

(5) Decree refusing order of sale or confirmation of sale

$2.00

(6) Decree of partition and distribution

$2.00

(7) Decree approving or setting aside the report of a commissioner of partition and distribution

$2.00

(8) Decree removing an executor, administrator or guardian (with the fee to be paid by that executor, administrator, or guardian)

$1.00

(9) Fiat or certificate

$2.00

(10) Continuance

$0.10

(11) Orders for which another fee is not prescribed

$2.00

(12) Administering oath or affirmation with certificate and seal

$2.00

(13) Administering oath or affirmation without certificate and seal

$0.25

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1080, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 379 (H.B. 1062), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 3.07, eff. January 1, 2022.

SUBCHAPTER E. FEES OF JUSTICE OF THE PEACE

Sec. 118.121. FEE SCHEDULE. A justice of the peace shall collect the following fees for services rendered after judgment (Sec. 118.123):

(1) Transcript

$10.00

(2) Abstract of judgment

$5.00

(3) Execution, order of sale, writ of restitution, or other writ or process

$5.00 per page

Certified copy of court papers

$2.00 for

first page

$0.25 for each additional page

Issuing other document

(no return required)

$1.00 for

first page

$0.25 for each additional page

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 19(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1080, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 977, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 552 (S.B. 1412), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 3.08, eff. January 1, 2022.

Sec. 118.123. FEES AFTER ENTRY OF JUDGMENT. (a) The fee for "Services rendered after judgment" under Section 118.121(2) applies to a civil matter in a justice court or small claims court.

(b) The fee for a "Transcript" under Section 118.121(2) is for making and certifying a transcript of the entries on a docket and, in the case of an appeal or certiorari, for filing the transcript with the original papers of the case in the proper court.

(c) The fee for an "Abstract of judgment" under Section 118.121(2) is for issuing an abstract of judgment.

(d) The fee for an "Execution, order of sale, writ of restitution, or other writ or process" under Section 118.121(2) is for issuing and recording the return on any of those documents. The fee applies only to a writ or process for the issuance of which another fee is not provided by this subchapter.

(e) The fee for "Issuing other document (no return required)" under Section 118.121(2) is for issuing a certificate, notice, statement, or any other document, except for a certified copy of court papers, that a justice of the peace is authorized or required to issue on which a return is not to be recorded. The fee must be paid at the time the order is placed.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 19(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1080, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(99), eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 977, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 118.1235. FEE FOR CERTIFIED COPY. The fee for "Certified copy of court papers" under Section 118.121(2) is for issuing a certified copy of a paper filed in a justice court or a small claims court. The fee must be paid at the time the order is placed.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 977, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 118.124. PROHIBITED FEES. A justice of the peace is not entitled to a fee for:

(1) the examination of a paper or record in the justice's office;

(2) filing any process or document the justice issues that is returned to court;

(3) a motion or judgment on a motion for security for costs;

(4) taking or approving a bond for costs; or

(5) the first copy of a document in a criminal case issued to:

(A) a criminal defendant in the case;

(B) an attorney representing a criminal defendant in the case; or

(C) a prosecuting attorney.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 33, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 205 (S.B. 409), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER F. FEES OF SHERIFF AND CONSTABLE

Sec. 118.131. FEES SET BY COMMISSIONERS COURT. (a) The commissioners court of a county may set reasonable fees to be charged for service of process, including service of writs, by the offices of the sheriff and constables.

(b) The commissioners court may not set fees higher than is necessary to pay the expenses of providing the services.

(c) The commissioners court may not set fees under this section more than once during any one-year period.

(d) The commissioners court must set the fees before October 1 of each year to be effective January 1 of the following year.

(e) A notice setting out the fees shall be posted in the same manner in which notices are posted under Section 81.007 and shall be posted in the offices of the county officials who are authorized to charge the fees.

(f) On or before October 15 of the year in which the fees are initially set, the commissioners court shall provide written notice of the amounts of the fees to the comptroller. If the commissioners court changes the amount of a fee set under this section, the commissioners court shall provide to the comptroller, on or before October 15 of the year in which the amount is changed, a written notice of the change in the amount of the fee. Before December 15 of each year, the comptroller shall compile the fee information provided by counties and send the compilation to:

(1) the commissioners court of each county in this state;

(2) any statewide association of counties or of officers of counties that requests in writing before December 15 to be informed; and

(3) the State Bar of Texas.

(g) A commissioners court that receives a notice under Subsection (f)(1) shall furnish the notice to its district clerk, county clerk, justices of the peace, sheriff, and constables.

(h) If the commissioners court does not set fees under this section, the fees for services by the offices of the sheriff and constables are those fees provided by law in effect for the preceding fiscal year.

(i) The commissioners court may not assess an applicant a fee in connection with the filing, serving, or entering of a protective order. A fee may not be charged to an applicant to dismiss, modify, or withdraw a protective order.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 21(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 326, Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 144, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 1024, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 92 (H.B. 145), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 256 (S.B. 1612), Sec. 18, eff. January 1, 2024.

Sec. 118.132. SERVICE OF PROCESS FOR APPELLATE COURT. A sheriff shall collect the same fee for service of process issued by the supreme court or a court of appeals as the fee provided for service of process issued by a district court.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 118.133. SHERIFF'S AND CONSTABLE'S RESPONSE TO FALSE ALARM IN POPULOUS COUNTY. (a) The commissioners court of a county with a population of more than 3.3 million by order may adopt a system by which the county charges a fee if the sheriff's or constable's office of the county responds to a security alarm and the emergency for which the alarm device was designed to give notice does not exist.

(b) The fee shall be charged to a person exercising control of the property on which the alarm device is installed.

(c) The commissioners court shall set the amount of the fee. The court may set a single fee that is charged for each response to a false alarm or may establish a fee structure under which different fees are charged according to the differing circumstances of each false alarm. However, the amount of a fee may not exceed the amount of the actual costs incurred by the sheriff's or constable's office in responding to the alarm.

(d) Fees collected under this Act shall be deposited in the county treasury to the credit of the general fund of the county.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 22(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 53, 54, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2626), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2626), Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 118.134. PAYMENT OF COSTS INCURRED FOR CARE OF CERTAIN PROPERTY. (a) A sheriff or constable may keep possession of property legally acquired until the party seeking to replevy the property pays the officer's costs incurred for the storage, security, or management of the property.

(b) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to costs incurred on property seized in conjunction with an offense alleged under the Penal Code, Code of Criminal Procedure, or Title 116, Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes, when the owner of the property is subsequently found to be not guilty of an offense or other proscribed activity described in those statutes, or if other charges whether criminal or civil are dropped.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 749, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

SUBCHAPTER G. FEES OF COUNTY TREASURER

Sec. 118.141. FEE SCHEDULE. (a) The county treasurer, or another officer who receives revenue in place of the county treasurer, may collect the following fees for services rendered to any person:

(1) Returned check (Sec. 118.142)

not less than $15.00

or more

than $30.00

(2) copy of check or other record (Sec. 118.144)

$ 1.00

(b) The county treasurer or another officer who receives revenue in place of the county treasurer may collect, from a person to whom the county issues a check, a fee for a stop-payment order as described by Section 118.143:

(1) in an amount equal to the stop-payment fee charged to the county by the county depositary bank; or

(2) in an amount not to exceed $20.00.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 30, Sec. 1, eff. Oct. 20, 1987; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 340, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 118.142. RETURNED CHECK. The fee for "Returned check" under Section 118.141 is for a check that is presented to a county in payment of any service, fee, claim, registration, fine, or other cost of the county and is returned by the depository bank or another bank for any reason considered to be the fault of the drawer, including:

(1) insufficient funds to cover the check;

(2) closed account;

(3) unauthorized signature; or

(4) drawn on uncollected funds.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 118.143. STOP-PAYMENT ORDER. The fee for a "Stop-payment order" under Section 118.141 is for placement of a stop-payment order on a check issued by a county for which the county will be directly or indirectly charged by the depository bank or another bank.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 118.144. COPY OF CHECK OR OTHER RECORD. The fee for "Copy of check or other record" under Section 118.141 is for each copy made of a page or part of a page of records, orders, checks, or other papers on file or of record in the treasurer's office. The fee applies to both certified and uncertified copies.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 118.145. DISPOSITION OF FEES COLLECTED. The fees collected under this subchapter shall be deposited in the general fund of the county to the credit of the county treasurer fees of office account.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER H. FEES OF COUNTY SURVEYOR

Sec. 118.161. FEE SCHEDULE. A county surveyor shall collect the following fees:

(1) for recording the field notes and plat of a survey for a tract of land, providing copies of field notes, plats, or other papers or records, and certifying any copies, the same amount collected by the county clerk of the county as a filing fee;

(2) for surveying a tract of land or designating a homestead:

(A) the actual expenses incurred, including all expenses of making the survey, preparing a survey report, field notes, plat, and other documents required by law, and filing those documents in the records of the county surveyor or the General Land Office; and

(B) any fees for surveying services agreed on by the county surveyor and the person seeking the services; and

(3) for filing an application to purchase or lease a vacancy or for surveying a vacancy, the amounts provided by Subchapter E, Chapter 51, Natural Resources Code.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 991, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER I. FEES OF COUNTY TAX ASSESSOR-COLLECTOR

Sec. 118.171. RETURNED CHECK. The county tax assessor-collector has the same authority to set and collect a fee for a check returned to the tax assessor-collector that the county clerk has under Sections 118.011 and 118.0215.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 18(d), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER Y. PENALTIES

Sec. 118.801. OVERCHARGING OF FEES; PENALTY. (a) An officer named in this chapter who, in bad faith, demands and receives a higher fee than authorized under this chapter or a fee that is not authorized under this chapter is liable to the aggrieved person for four times the amount unlawfully demanded and received.

(b) An officer who, in good faith, demands and receives a higher fee than authorized or a fee not authorized under this chapter is liable to the aggrieved person for the difference between the amount demanded and received and the amount of the fee authorized under this chapter.

(c) The demand for and receipt of a fee authorized by the legislature that is later determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to be unlawful is considered to be a good faith action by the officer.

(d) In this section, "bad faith" includes a demand that an officer makes with the knowledge that a fee is not authorized by law.

(e) The provisions of this section shall not affect the right of any party to recover attorney's fees, interest, or costs of court as provided by other law.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 34, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 142, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.